Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-1423
Benefits received; employer contributions; effect on other benefits or aid.

(1) A student loan program, student grant program, or other program administered by any agency of the state, except as may be otherwise provided by federal law or the provisions of any specific grant applicable to the federal law, shall not take into account and shall not consider amounts available for the payment of qualified education expenses pursuant to the Nebraska educational savings plan trust in determining need and eligibility for student aid.

(2) A government program administered by any agency of the state that provides benefits or aid to individuals based on financial need, except as may be otherwise provided by federal law or the provisions of any specific grant applicable to the federal law, shall not take into account and shall not consider contributions made to a participant's account by the participant's employer in determining the income of such participant.

Laws 2000, LB 1003, § 10;

Laws 2012, LB1104, § 10;

Laws 2020, LB1042, § 5;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 85-1810;

Laws 2025, LB647, § 48.